Utah statutes.
19-3-309.   Restricted accounts.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the "Nuclear Waste Facility Oversight Account" and referred to in this section
as the "oversight account".
(2) (a)  The oversight account shall be funded from the fees imposed  and
collected under Subsections 19-3-308(1)(a) and(b).
(b)  The department shall deposit in the oversight account all fees collected
under Subsections 19-3-308(1)(a) and(b).
(c)  The Legislature may appropriate the funds in this oversight account to
departments of state government as necessary for those departments to carry
out their duties to implement this part.
(d)  The department shall account separately for money paid into the oversight
account for each separate application made pursuant to Section 19-3-304.
(3) (a)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known
as the "Nuclear Accident and Hazard Compensation Account," to be referred to
as the "compensation account" within this part.
(b)  The compensation account shall be funded from the fees assessed and
collected under this part, except for Subsections 19-3-308(1)(a) and (b).
(c)  The department shall deposit in the compensation account all fees
collected under this part, except for those fees under Subsections
19-3-308(1)(a) and (b).
(d)  The compensation account shall earn interest, which shall be deposited in
the account.
(e)  The Legislature may appropriate the funds in the compensation account to
the departments of state government as necessary for those departments to
comply with the requirements of this part.
(4)  On the date when a state license is issued in accordance with Subsection
19-3-301(4)(a), the Division of Finance shall transfer all fees remaining in
the oversight account attributable to that license into the compensation
account.
